Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-118.02
Written adoption assistance agreement;
required; contents.

Before a final decree of adoption is issued, the Department
of Health and Human Services and the adoptive parent or parents shall enter
into a written adoption assistance agreement stating the terms of assistance
as provided for by sections 43-117 to 43-118 if the child is eligible for
such assistance and designating a guardian for the child in case of the death
of the adoptive parent or parents.

Laws 2012, LB1062, § 1.